Washington statutes.
RCW 11.100.120

Use of trust funds for life insurance.

Subject to the standards of RCW 11.100.020, a fiduciary is authorized to use trust funds to acquire life insurance upon the life of any beneficiary or upon the life of another in whose life such beneficiary has an insurable interest.

[ 1985 c 30 s 76. Prior: 1984 c 149 s 112; 1973 1st ex.s. c 89 s 1. Formerly RCW 30.24.120.]

NOTES:

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.

Severability—Effective dates—1984 c 149: See notes following RCW 11.02.005.

Insurable interest, guardian, trustee or other fiduciary: RCW 48.18.030(3)(c).